Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.390

Mortgage brokers—Call reports—Licensing system and registry.

Each mortgage broker licensee must submit call reports through the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry in a form and containing the information as prescribed by the director or as deemed necessary by the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.

[ 2015 c 229 s 18; 2009 c 528 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—License requirement—Implementation—2009 c 528: See notes following RCW 19.146.010.